California statutes. Water Code
If completion of the project is not approved at the election, the board may modify the project or propose a new project. If a revised report is not prepared within six months of the election, the board shall enter an order declaring the project abandoned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 59.3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42357.

The order of abandonment shall require all persons having claims against the district or proposed district, except the holders of warrants issued pursuant to the provisions of this division and presented for payment, to file them with the necessary vouchers with the district within three months from the date of the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 59.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42358.

Notice of the order requiring presentation of claims stating the time and place shall be published by the board in the county in which the office of the district is located once a week for four successive weeks, commencing within 10 days after the making of the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 59.7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42359.

After all warrants issued under the provisions of this division which have been presented for payment and all claims that have been presented and have been allowed and approved by the board have been paid, the board shall cause a certified copy of the order declaring the project abandoned to be filed for record in the office of the recorder of each affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 59.9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42360.

After the filing of the copy of the order the district is dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

42361.

All liens which have attached to land under any provisions of this division are discharged with the filing of the copy of the order, and any undertakings given are annulled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Recommendation of Completion of Project [42525. - 42552.]



  ARTICLE 2. Election [42525. - 42526.]

42525.

Within 45 days after the board approves the report, it shall call a district election for the purpose of determining whether the recommendation and report shall be adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42526.

The election shall be noticed, held, and conducted and the result determined and declared in all respects as nearly as possible as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 42325) of Chapter 2 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Proceedings After Election [42550. - 42552.]

42550.

If a majority of all votes cast are “Completion of project—Yes” and also a majority of the qualified voters who voted at the election voted “Completion of project—Yes,” the report and recommendation is adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

42551.

The board shall carry out the project of the district in accordance with the plans and specifications of the approved and adopted report of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

42552.

If completion of the project is not approved at the election, the project is abandoned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Project Uncompleted [42700. - 42729.]



  ARTICLE 1. New Report [42700. - 42702.]

42700.

If any project, whether original, modified, substituted or other, already adopted under this part, remains uncompleted, whether in whole or in part, and any assessment levied under Part 9 (commencing with Section 46000) of this division on the basis of the project remains uncalled, either in whole or in part, and if the board finds, through resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of its entire membership, that, for reasons explicitly stated in the resolution, the project should be materially modified or should be completely abandoned and another project be substituted in its place, then the board shall proceed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 42200) of this part to prepare a new report which shall be complete in itself and which shall set up the existing project as materially modified or a new project to be substituted in its place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42701.

The report shall specify what disposition or use shall be made in the new project or otherwise of such parts of the existing project as have been completed and are in process of completion and of such property as the district has acquired. An abandonment of such existing project shall not restore any project, original or other, which had been displaced by such existing project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

42702.

Thereafter all proceedings in respect of the new report shall be conducted as set forth in this part for an original report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Elections and Subsequent Proceedings [42725. - 42729.]

42725.

If the vote at either of the elections prescribed in this part is adverse to the report, the proposed project is abandoned. Thereafter the district shall continue, and the original project shall be and remain in the same full force and effect, as though no proceedings had been taken under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42726.

If the vote at either of the elections is favorable to the new report, nothing further shall be done toward completion of the former project so modified or eliminated. If there is any uncalled portion of principal or interest of any outstanding assessment already levied and in effect to carry out the former project, the board shall, by resolution, cancel so much thereof as is not required for a refund to landowners who have already paid all or a part of their pro rata share of the portion to be canceled. The board shall specify in this resolution the portion of the assessment levied against each tract which is to be canceled, describing each tract as described in the assessment roll or by the number of the tract as used in the assessment roll. These and subsequent proceedings under this section shall be governed by Sections 47806, 47807, 47808, 47809, and 47810.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42727.

To the extent that the district is indebted or has any outstanding liabilities at the time of adoption of the report, whether contingent or otherwise, the board shall levy, by order from time to time, special assessments upon the land in the district, pro rata according to the rate of assessment per acre established in the original assessment, to raise funds to pay the debts and liabilities. The provisions of Chapters 3 and 5 of Part 9 of this division shall be applicable to such assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

42728.

If, after all debts and liabilities have been paid, any funds remain on hand which have been collected under the original assessment or any funds are subsequently collected through redemptions from any sale for any delinquent call on the original assessment, such funds shall, unless distributed to landowners pursuant to Section 46675, be credited pro rata to the respective tracts of land in the district on the assessment roll for the original assessment according to the rate of assessment per acre established in the original assessment and thereafter shall be applied on account for the benefit of the tracts of land against any call on any assessment levied upon the tracts through proceedings authorized under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 821.)
-------------------------------------------

42729.

If for any reason funds are not available to the district to defray all expenses under this article, as estimated by the board to be incurred for the general benefit of the district up to the time that a new assessment for the new project has been levied and become available under Chapter 2 of Part 9 of this division, the board may levy assessments from time to time pursuant to Chapter 1 of Part 9 of this division to raise the necessary funds to defray such expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Additional Projects [42750. - 42752.]

42750.

If the board shall find, by a two-thirds vote of its entire membership, that some project, other than any project (whether original, modified, substituted, or other) already adopted, should be adopted then the board shall proceed under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 42200) of this part to prepare an additional report which shall be complete in itself and shall set up the project as an additional project for the district. The additional report shall not modify, rescind, or terminate any other project which has already been adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42751.

Thereafter all proceedings in respect of the additional report shall be conducted as set forth in this part for an original report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 392.)
-------------------------------------------

42752.

If for any reason funds are not available to the district to defray all expenses under this chapter as estimated by the board to be incurred for the general benefit of the district up to the time that a new assessment for such additional project has been levied and become available under Chapter 2 of Part 9 of this division, the board may levy assessments from time to time pursuant to Chapter 1 Part 9 of this division to raise the necessary funds to defray such expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 392.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. POWERS AND FUNCTIONS [43000. - 44208.]



  CHAPTER 1. Water and Electricity [43000. - 43026.]



  ARTICLE 1. Water [43000. - 43007.]

43000.

The board may acquire, improve, and operate the necessary works for the storage and distribution of water, and any drainage or reclamation works connected therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43001.

The board may sell, distribute, or otherwise dispose of water and water rights not necessary for the uses and purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43002.

The board may grant to the owner or lessee of a right to the use of any water permission to store the water in any reservoir of the district or to carry it through any conduit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43003.

The board shall establish equitable rules and regulations for the most economical and efficient distribution and use of water within the district, and pursuant thereto may enter into long-term water service contracts with landowners in the district which contracts may, in the discretion of the board, provide, among other things, that the obligations are a lien on the land with the same force, effect, and priority as an assessment lien if such contract is recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county in which such land is situated. The rules, regulations, and contracts shall recognize and shall be subject to such priorities in the right to water between the different consumers of the water as may legally exist. Among other things the rules and regulations may establish a procedure for fixing tolls and charges authorized by Sections 43006 and 47180 and may provide equitable rules for reapportionment of assessments supplementary to the provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 46325) of Chapter 2 of Part 9 of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

43003.5.

Upon adoption of rules and regulations, or the adoption of any amendment thereto, a certified copy thereof shall be recorded with the county recorder of each affected county, and until so recorded, no rule or regulation, or amendment thereto, shall be enforceable against any person not having actual knowledge thereof. A copy of the adopted rules and regulations in effect in the district shall be maintained on file and open for inspection at the district office by the district secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

43004.

In the event that the volume of water under the control of any district is in any season so diminished below normal, by reason of water shortage or otherwise, as to make it probable that all the land cannot receive the full amount of water which it may need and to which it would otherwise be entitled, the deficiency shall be borne ratably by all the land, except insofar as priorities in the right to water as between different lands may prevent. The board may make rules and regulations to provide for distributing the burden of the deficiency and for the most economical and efficient use of the water which is or probably will be available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43005.

The board may enter into contracts with any or all interested parties for settlement or determination of any or all water rights on any stream system or on any part thereof which concerns the district or for the administration of water rights or of waters of any such stream system or any part thereof, whether by watermaster or otherwise; and if, in connection with any such contract and to make such contract efficiently operable for the benefit of the district, the board shall expressly find that the district should act for others also, whether their lands and water rights are within or without the district, then the district, with the written approval of any interested party for whom the district undertakes to act, may do so to the extent and under the terms which are expressed in any such contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 821.)
-------------------------------------------

43006.

In addition to levying assessments or fixing tolls and charges under Part 9 (commencing with Section 46000) of this division, and in lieu either in whole or in part of calling such assessments, the board may fix tolls or charges for the use of water, including the use of groundwater, or for any other service of any type or nature whether or not related to water use, rendered by the district, and collect the same from all persons receiving the benefit of the water or other services. The tolls and charges shall be proportional, as nearly as practicable, to the services rendered. Such tolls or charges may be levied and collected in order to provide, in whole or in part, for the payment of amounts due to the state, the department, any other district, or the United States, whether for capital charges or service charges or otherwise, pursuant to contracts made in accordance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 44000) of this part, or in order to provide, in whole or in part, for the payment of the costs of a project or the principal of and interest on bonds or warrants of the district, or in order to provide a bond reserve fund to secure bonds of the district, or in order to provide for the operation and maintenance of a project pursuant to Section 47180, or to obtain funds for any lawful purpose of the district. The provisions of Sections 47181 to 47185, inclusive, shall be applicable to any such tolls or charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

43007.

If tolls or charges are levied and collected in order to provide, in whole or in part, for the payment of amounts due under more than one contract, such tolls and charges may be fixed, levied and collected in such a manner as to, as nearly as practicable, charge the lands served under a particular contract with the amounts due under such contract. The assessment commissioners appointed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 46150) of Part 9 of this division may apply this principle in determining the portion of the total benefits to accrue to the district under a particular contract which will be realized by each parcel of land in separate ownership in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Electricity [43025. - 43026.]

43025.

The board may provide for the generation and distribution of hydroelectric energy incidental to water storage and distribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43026.

The board may sell, distribute, or otherwise dispose of hydroelectric energy not necessary for the uses and purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Powers and Functions [43150. - 43161.]

43150.

The board has all powers and authority necessary to enable it to fully perform the duties imposed upon it by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43151.

The board may enter into any agreement with the United States or with any state, county, district, public corporation, or municipality of any kind, for a purpose appertaining to or beneficial to the project of the district, and it may do any acts necessary or proper for the performance of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43152.

The board may:

(a) Adopt a seal.

(b) Make and execute all necessary contracts.

(c) Employ and appoint such agents, officers, and employees as may be required, and prescribe their duties.

(d) Itself or by agents enter upon any lands to make surveys, locate works, or for any other necessary and lawful purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43153.

The board may construct works across or intersecting any stream of water, watercourse, street, avenue, highway, railway, or conduit in such manner as to afford security for life and property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43154.

The board shall restore any property altered or damaged when so crossed or intersected to its former state as nearly as may be, or in a manner so as not to have impaired unnecessarily its usefulness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43155.

Every company whose railroad is intersected or crossed by the works shall unite with the board in forming intersections and crossings, and grant privileges necessary to construct the works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43156.

If any railroad company and the board, or the owners and controllers of the property to be crossed, cannot agree upon the amount to be paid for the privilege, or the points or the matter of the crossings or intersections, the same shall be ascertained and determined in all respects as provided in this division in respect to the taking of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43157.

The right of way is hereby given, dedicated, and set apart for the location, construction, and maintenance of works over and through any land which is or may be the property of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43158.

All waters and water rights belonging to this State within the district are given, dedicated, and set apart for the uses and purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43159.

The department and board shall, respectively, cause to be entered in books to be kept for that purpose a complete and connected record of all their acts and transactions. All contracts and other written instruments shall be executed in duplicate, one copy of each of which, together with any other documents, instruments, or other papers filed with them, shall be kept and preserved on file in their respective offices and open to inspection by the public during business hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

43160.

The records and all documents, instruments, or other papers filed with the department, commission, or board, or a copy or copies of any thereof certified by the department, commission, or secretary, shall be received in evidence without further proof in any court of this State, or before any board or tribunal authorized to hear or consider a matter wherein the same are properly admissible in evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

43161.

Whenever it deems it necessary for its own guidance or for the best interests of the district, the board may submit any question or proposition relating to the construction, improvement, or operation of the works or the carrying out of the project of the district to the qualified voters of the district at any general election or at a special election called for the purpose. The election shall be in all respects conducted as other elections in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Property [43500. - 43559.]



  ARTICLE 1. Acquisition of Property [43500. - 43508.]

43500.

The board may acquire by any means any property or interest in property to carry out the district purposes, including any of the following:

(a) Property either within or without the boundaries of the district for the construction, maintenance, improvement, or operation of works or the carrying out of the project in this State or in any other state or foreign nation.

(b) Property and rights of private owners devoted to a public use.

(c) Stocks of domestic or foreign corporations.

(d) Rights to store water in any reservoir.

(e) Rights to carry water through any conduit within or without the State not owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------

43501.

The board may pay for property and rights with bonds of the district upon such terms and conditions as it deems best.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43502.

No bonds shall be given in payment for property or rights at a valuation less than 90 percent of their face value and accrued interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43504.

The board may take conveyances, leases, contracts, or other assurances for all property acquired by it under the provisions of this division in the name of the district, to and for the uses and purposes expressed in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43505.

The legal title to all property acquired under the provisions of this division vests in the district immediately. All property is held by the district in trust for the uses and purposes set forth in this division and is hereby dedicated and set apart to such uses and purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43506.

The board may hold, use, manage, occupy, and possess property of the district, and may lease property of the district for oil, gas and other mineral development or for agricultural or other purposes if in the opinion of the board such action will not interfere substantially with the district’s operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 821.)
-------------------------------------------

43507.

The board may determine by resolution entered upon its minutes that any property, real or personal, held by the district is not necessary for the uses and purposes thereof and may sell the same for an adequate consideration. Title may be conveyed or transferred to the purchaser by the president and secretary pursuant to the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43508.

The rights of way, ditches, canals, flumes, pipelines, dams, water rights, reservoirs, power plants, and transmission lines, and all other property of like character belonging to a district shall not be taxed for State and county or municipal purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Eminent Domain [43530. - 43532.5.]

43530.

The board may acquire by condemnation all property it deems necessary for the construction, maintenance, improvement, and operation of the works or the carrying out of the project of the district, except that private property devoted to the use of one water storage district or any irrigation district or other district or any city or county shall not be taken by any water storage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43532.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this article, the board shall not commence any proceedings in eminent domain with respect to property located outside of a county in which the district is located unless the board of supervisors of the county in which such property is situated gives its approval to such proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sale of Excess Land Acquired by Condemnation [43555. - 43559.]

43555.

Where the district has acquired fee title to, or any interest in, land through condemnation proceedings and the board, pursuant to Section 43507, determines that said property or any part thereof or interest therein is no longer necessary for the uses and purposes of said district and that said property or any part thereof or interest therein shall be disposed of by sale, such sale shall be made as hereinafter provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------

43556.

Written notice of sale shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district, or if there is no such newspaper, then within the county in which the district or any part thereof is situated, pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code. The notice shall describe the land or interest therein to be sold; set forth in general terms the interests, easements or reservations to be reserved to the district; state the time, place and terms or conditions of the sale; and call for sealed bids in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------

43557.

At the time and place set for the sale the board shall open any bids received in response to the notice, announce such bids, and call for oral bids. When all persons present shall have ceased bidding, the board shall declare the bidding closed, subject to the preference right of owners of contiguous land as hereinafter provided, and shall announce the amount of the highest bidder. In the event no oral bids are made and there are duplicate written bids, the highest bidder shall be the one whose bid was received first in time by the board. In no event may land be sold or a purchaser declared before the end of the 30-day period for assertion by contiguous landowners of their preference right of purchase.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------

43558.

The owners of contiguous land have a preference for a period of thirty (30) days after the highest bid is announced to purchase at such highest bid price. No right of preference shall be given in cases of owners of cornering land.

Where there is a conflict between two or more owners of contiguous land claiming a preference right of purchase, the one from whom such land was acquired by the district by eminent domain shall take preference. If such prior owner does not assert a preference right to purchase, the property shall be sold to that owner of contiguous land claiming preference who, in the opinion of the board, by acquisition of such land would be enabled to make the most beneficial use thereof based on topography, land pattern, location of water, improvements and similar factors.

If no owners of contiguous land qualify within said thirty (30) day period the sale shall be declared closed and sale made to the highest bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 239.)
-------------------------------------------

43559.

Upon the expiration of the 30-day period any sale and conveyance made pursuant to the board’s award of bid or any sale and conveyance made pursuant to the exercise of a preference by the owner of contiguous land pursuant to this article shall be conclusively presumed to be valid as being in compliance with the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1037.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Controversies [43700. - 43850.]



  ARTICLE 1. Actions and Proceedings [43700. - 43707.]

43700.

A district may commence and maintain any actions and proceedings to carry out its purposes or protect its interests and may defend in any action or proceeding brought against it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43701.

In all actions or proceedings the board may sue, appear, and defend in person or by attorneys and in the name of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43702.

Service of summons upon a district may be made by serving it upon the secretary or a majority of the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43703.

The costs of any action, proceeding, or contest may be allowed and apportioned between the parties or taxed to the defeated party in the discretion of the court or other tribunal before which it is heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43704.

All findings of fact or conclusions of the department, commission, or board upon all matters shall be conclusive unless the action, proceeding, or contest is instituted within 60 days after the findings or conclusions are made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 592.)
-------------------------------------------

43705.

If two or more actions or contests are pending at the same time in the same court or before the same tribunal for the purpose of contesting or determining the validity of identical or similar acts or matters under the provisions of this division, the actions or contests shall be consolidated and tried together.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43706.

The court or other tribunal before which any action, proceeding, or contest is brought involving the regularity, legality, validity, or correctness of any proceeding taken or thing done pursuant to any of the provisions of this division, shall disregard any error, irregularity, or omission which does not affect the substantial rights of the parties concerned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

43707.

In all actions, proceedings, or contests the rules of pleading and practice provided by the Code of Civil Procedure shall apply, insofar as they are not inconsistent with the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Validating Proceedings [43730. - 43730.]

43730.

An action to determine the validity of bonds, assessments, contracts, including contracts with the state, the department, any other district, or the United States, the adoption of a project or the taking of any other action by the district or by the board under the provisions of this division may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Limitations [43850. - 43850.]

43850.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, no action, proceeding, or contest shall be brought or maintained before any court or other tribunal unless the action, proceeding, or contest is brought within the times specified in the following subdivisions, or any lesser time that may be specified in this division:

(a) Attacking the organization of any district, within six months of the date of the organization thereof.

(b) Attacking the inclusion of land within or the exclusion of land from any district, within six months of the date of the inclusion or exclusion.

(c) Attacking any assessment of any district, within 60 days of the date upon which the assessment roll is filed with the county treasurer or treasurers.

(d) Attacking the validity of any bonds issued by any district, within 60 days of the date of adoption of the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 592.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Cooperation With the United States, the State and Other Districts [44000. - 44105.]



  ARTICLE 1. Contracts [44000. - 44006.]

44000.

Any district may cooperate and contract with the state, the department, any other district, or the United States under any laws of the state or the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, or under any other act of Congress heretofore or hereafter enacted authorizing or permitting the cooperation or contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44001.

The cooperation and contract may be for any or all of the following purposes:

(a) Construction, acquisition, purchase, extension, operation, or maintenance of works for irrigation, drainage, storage, flood control, generation and distribution of hydroelectric energy incidental thereto, or any of these.

(b) A water supply.

(c) Assumption as principal or guarantor of indebtedness to the state, the department, any other district, or the United States.

(d) To carry out the terms of any contract between the district and the state, the department, any other district, or the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44002.

Any contract made between a district and the state, the department, any other district, or the United States may designate and describe the land which is to be served with water from the waterworks or system contemplated under the contract and, in that case, only such land may be charged with any of the assessments mentioned in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44003.

The board may provide by contract with the state, the department, any other district, or the United States for the delivery and distribution of water for the land of the district under any laws of the state or acts of Congress and under any rules and regulations established thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44006.

The board shall perform all acts necessary to carry out the enlarged powers enumerated in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Levy of Assessments [44030. - 44032.]

44030.

If a contract with the state, the department, any other district, or the United States requires the payment by the district of periodic service charges, the amount shall be levied from time to time as an assessment on land in the district, to the extent that funds are not otherwise available for the payment of such charges. Upon request of the board, assessment commissioners shall be appointed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 46150) of Part 9 of this division who shall determine the portion of the total benefits to accrue to the district under the contract which will be realized by each parcel of land in separate ownership in the district. The determination shall be stated in apportionment rolls substantially in form and manner as provided in Chapter 2 of Part 9 of this division, except that the apportionment of benefits shall be stated in percentages of benefits to the district as a whole, or in such other manner as may be determined upon by the commissioners. Thereafter all assessments levied in order to meet the payments due or to become due under the contract shall be apportioned among the respective tracts of land in accordance with the rolls. Any such assessment shall be collected in the same manner as an original assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 688.)
-------------------------------------------

44031.

If a contract with the state, the department, any other district, or the United States requires the payment by the district of capital charges in periodic installments, the total amount of such charges may be levied in the same manner as an original assessment pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 46150) of Part 9 of this division, or the respective amounts of such installments may be levied from time to time in the same manner as periodic service charges, as provided in Section 44030, but an assessment or assessments shall in any event be levied in such a manner as to provide for the payment of all such charges, for which funds are not otherwise available, as they become due under the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 688.)
-------------------------------------------

44032.
